Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 46 Report and Accounting of State Funds by Local Officers

46.010.
Uniform system of accounting and reporting of state funds by local officers.

The Department for Local Government shall prescribe and keep in operation a uniform system of accounting and reporting on the receipt, use and handling of all public funds, other than taxes, due and payable to the state from county, district, and other local officers and agencies.

The system so adopted shall require each county treasurer, and each county officer who receives or disburses state funds, to keep an accurate account of receipts and disbursements, showing a daily balance of receipts and disbursements.

The system shall require all county officers handling state funds, other than taxes, to make an annual report to the Department for Local Government showing receipts and disbursements, and to make other financial statements as the Department for Local Government requires.

The Department for Local Government, subject to the approval of the Governor, may from time to time change the system, or any book, report, form, or record provided for by the system, whenever in its opinion a change is necessary in order to conform to existing conditions.

History.

4606a-1, 4606a-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1986, ch. 374, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 69, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 31, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 37, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Certificate of delinquency redeemed by payment to state, how payment reported and accounted for, KRS

134.450

,

134.480

.

Collection of public claims by action, KRS Ch. 135.

Constitutional provisions as to report and accounting of state funds, Ky. Const., § 53.

Fees of county officers, when to be accounted for and paid into State Treasury:

Circuit clerk, county clerk, sheriff and jailer in certain counties, KRS

64.345

.

Fines, forfeitures and officers’ fees, sheriff to collect and account for, KRS

6.071

,

70.090

.

Motor vehicle operator’s license fees:

Circuit clerk to report and pay into State Treasury, KRS

186.400

,

186.490

.

Penalties for failure of clerk to report and pay in, disposition of, KRS

186.490

.

Motor vehicle registration and chauffeur’s fees:

County clerk to report and pay into State Treasury, KRS

186.230

,

186.240

.

Penalties for failure of clerk to report and pay in, disposition of, KRS

186.230

.

Receipts of state budget units, how collected and accounted for, KRS

45.260

.

Receipts of state budget units to be deposited directly in State Treasury, KRS

41.070

.

Receipts to be given to persons paying money into State Treasury, KRS

41.100

.

Revenue Cabinet, functions of:

Actions against delinquent collecting officers, KRS

135.060

.

Investigation of records and accounts of collecting officers, KRS

131.210

.

System of uniform accounts for counties and county officers, Revenue Cabinet to prescribe and install, KRS

68.210

,

131.140

.

Taxes, when sheriff or collector to report and pay into State Treasury, KRS

134.320

.

Tax forms and records, department of revenue to prescribe use and manner of keeping, KRS

131.130

.

Textbooks, money received from sale of to pupils, how accounted for, KRS

157.170

.

Tobacco warehouse license fees, how collected and paid into State Treasury, KRS

248.290

.

46.020.
Books and forms for system of uniform accounting.

The Department for Local Government shall prepare, and shall cause to be printed and paid for in the same manner as other books, blanks, and records for counties and county officers, all books, blanks, and records necessary for the system of uniform accounting established under KRS

46.010

. The Department for Local Government shall deliver to each county, district, or other local officer charged with the duty of collecting, disbursing, or handling state funds the books, blanks, and records as are necessary for that officer. Each county, district, or other local officer receiving the books, blanks, or records shall use them in the performance of his duties with reference to the handling and disbursing of state funds. Any of these books, blanks, or records used by state officers or employees shall be printed and paid for in the same manner as other state printing.

History.

4606a-3, 4606a-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1986, ch. 374, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 69, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 32, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 38, effective July 15, 2010.

46.030.
Records of state funds collected by local officers.

Each circuit clerk and each county clerk shall keep a well-bound book in his office, and shall enter therein at the time it is receivable, or when received, all tax on suits and other money received by him for the state, showing of whom received, on what account, the amount received, and the date. The books so kept shall at all times be open to public inspection.

All county and district officers charged with the duty of collecting funds due the state shall keep a cash book and shall enter thereon, as collected, the amounts collected, from whom and on what account collected, and the date and amounts of payments into the State Treasury.

History.

4243, 4701a-2: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 14, effective January 2, 1978.

46.040.
When funds to be reported and paid in.

Except as provided in KRS

134.191

, all county, district and other local officers authorized to collect money for the state shall, on the last day of each month, report to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and pay into the State Treasury all such funds on hand.

History.

4606a-5: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 2009, ch. 10, § 55, effective January 1, 2010.

46.050.
Fines and forfeitures collected by circuit clerk, how paid in and accounted for. [Repealed.]

46.060.
Report of judgments in favor of state. [Repealed.]

46.070.
Proceedings against state debtors and delinquent officers collecting state funds.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report to the Attorney General all public officers or public debtors who fail to render their accounts at the proper time, or to pay the money in their hands due the state into the State Treasury, and shall cause actions to be brought against them. If in any such action it is found that nothing is due the state, the defendant shall nevertheless pay the costs.

History.

145: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the Attorney General shall institute any necessary actions to collect and cause the payment into the Treasury of all unsatisfied claims and accounts and judgments in favor of the Commonwealth, KRS

15.060

does not apply to the collection of those fines and forfeitures adjudged by the county judge (now county judge/executive) such as the forfeiture of a replevin bond.

OAG 68-526

.

Where a Circuit Court Clerk has not sent all of the excess fees in his office to the Finance Department (now Finance and Administration Cabinet), a state claim, as mentioned in KRS

15.060

and this section, would generally not arise and the Attorney General’s office would not be required to pursue the collection of such accounts.

OAG 70-604

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Costs not to be taxed against state, KRS

453.010

.

46.080.
Jurisdiction of violations.

The Franklin Circuit Court shall have concurrent jurisdiction of all civil and criminal actions brought to enforce any of the provisions of subsection (2) of KRS

46.030

or of subsection (1) of KRS

46.990

.

History.

4701a-5.

46.990.
Penalties.

Any county or district officer authorized by law to make collections of funds for the state who fails or refuses to pay over to the state the funds so collected at the time he is required by law to report the collections to any state department shall be required to pay a penalty of ten percent (10%) on all funds not so paid.

Any officer who fails or neglects to perform any duty required of him by KRS 46.030(1) shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any officer who fails to use any book, blank, or record required to be used under KRS

46.020

, or who willfully refuses to make any report required by the Department for Local Government under the provisions of KRS

46.010

or

46.020

, shall be subject to indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History.

4248, 4606a-3, 4701a-3: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1976, ch. 28, § 3; 1986, ch. 374, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 69, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 33, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 39, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Moreland, Criminal Jurisdiction of the Kentucky Courts: A Tentative Codification, 47 Ky. L.J. 7 (1958).